Alabama, session 2026rs, SB81.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
35 Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
36 following terms have the following meanings:
37 (1) COMMISSIONER. The Commissioner of Insurance.
38 (2) DENTAL BENEFIT PLAN. a. Any underwritten
39 stand-alone individual or group plan, policy, or contract
40 issued, delivered, or renewed in this state which is limited
41 to paying or reimbursing the costs of dental care services.
42 b. The term shall not include:
43 1. Self-funded dental plans, nor any health benefit
44 plan that includes dental care services, including, but not
45 limited to, Medicare Advantage plans, individual or group
46 health benefit plans offered pursuant to the federal Patient
47 Protection and Affordable Care Act, 42 U.S.C. § 18001 et seq.,
48 or grandfathered individual health benefit plans; and
49 2. Any dental benefit plan or health benefit plan that
50 includes dental care services provided pursuant to Chapter 25A
51 of Title 16, Code of Alabama 1975, or Chapter 29 of Title 36,
52 Code of Alabama 1975.
53 (3) DENTAL CARE SERVICES. Any services furnished to an
54 individual for the purpose of preventing, managing,
55 alleviating, curing, or healing dental illness or injury as
56 indicated by codes used for payment or reimbursement by the
Page 2

indicated by codes used for payment or reimbursement by the
SB81 INTRODUCED
57 insurer.
58 (4) DENTAL LOSS RATIO. The percentage of premiums
59 collected by an insurer from policyholders or subscribers
60 which the insurer spends on dental care services for patients.
61 (5) INSURER. A person as defined in Section 27-1-2,
62 Code of Alabama 1975, which issues, delivers, or renews a
63 dental benefit plan, including a nonprofit agricultural
64 organization that offers health benefits to its membership
65 under Chapter 33 of Title 2, Code of Alabama 1975.
66 (6) REPORTING PERIOD. Three rolling consecutive
67 calendar years.
68 (b)(1) The minimum dental loss ratio for dental benefit
69 plans in this state shall be 75 percent for underwritten
70 stand-alone individual dental plans and 83 percent for
71 underwritten stand-alone group dental plans, to be calculated
72 pursuant to subdivisions (2) through (4).
73 (2) The percentage for dental loss ratio purposes is a
74 fraction of which the numerator is the aggregated claims paid
75 for dental care services by the insurer in a reporting period,
76 and the denominator is the amount of all premiums collected by
77 the insurer in a reporting period.
78 (3)a. The aggregated claims paid by the insurer for
79 dental care services shall be calculated by:
80 1. Adding the amount paid or reimbursed on claims for
81 dental care services; then
82 2. Adding the amount of reserves and liabilities for
83 claims received during the reporting period but unpaid or not
84 reimbursed within three months after the end of the reporting
Page 3

reimbursed within three months after the end of the reporting
SB81 INTRODUCED
85 period; then
86 3. Subtracting any amount expended for dental care
87 services that was recovered due to overpayment or utilization
88 management.
89 b. The amount of all premiums collected by the insurer
90 shall be calculated by:
91 1. Including the total amount of money received from
92 policyholders or subscribers as a condition of receiving
93 coverage for dental care services; then
94 2. Subtracting payments for federal and state taxes,
95 licensing, and regulatory fees.
96 (4) The insurer's overhead expenses, to include all of
97 the following components, shall be excluded from the
98 calculations made under subdivision (3):
99 a. Financial administration expenses, including
100 underwriting, auditing, actuarial analyses, treasury, and
101 investment expenses.
102 b. Marketing, sales, and distribution expenses,
103 including advertising; group, policyholder, or subscriber
104 enrollment and relations, regardless of whether these
105 activities are performed by the carrier or outsourced to a
106 third-party vendor.
107 c. Distribution expenses, including commissions and
108 relations with agents, producers, brokers, and benefit
109 consultants.
110 d. Claims operation expenses, including adjudication,
111 appeals, settlements, claims payment processing, and costs
112 directly related to upgrades in health information technology
Page 4

directly related to upgrades in health information technology
SB81 INTRODUCED
113 which are designed primarily or solely to improve claims
114 payment capabilities or to meet regulatory requirements for
115 processing claims.
116 e. Dental administration expenses, including activities
117 related to care and disease management, utilization review,
118 dental management, network development, secondary network
119 savings, administrative fees, claims processing, utilization
120 management, fraud prevention activities, and provider
121 credentialing expenses, regardless of whether these activities
122 are performed by the carrier or outsourced to a third-party
123 vendor.
124 f. Provider expenses, such as consultants for
125 professional or administrative services, which do not
126 represent compensation or reimbursement for covered services
127 provided to an enrollee.
128 g. Expenses incurred for developing and executing
129 provider contracts, including fees associated with
130 establishing or managing a provider network, and fees paid to
131 vendors, costs of stop-loss coverage or reinsurance, direct
132 sales salaries, workforce salaries and benefits, agents and
133 broker fees and commissions, and general and administrative
134 expenses.
135 h. Network operational expenses, including contracting,
136 dentist relations, and dental policy procedures.
137 i. Charitable expenses, including any contributions to
138 tax-exempt foundations and community benefits.
139 j. Industry association expenses, including membership
140 activities.
Page 5

activities.
SB81 INTRODUCED
141 k. Employee and personnel expenses, including payroll,
142 recruitment, and human resources.
143 l. Physical plant expenses, including construction,
144 leasing, maintenance, cleaning, furniture, and equipment.
145 m. Third-party vendor and professional contractor
146 expenses, including related services or goods required under
147 paragraphs a. through l.
148 (c)(1) No later than April 30 after the end of a
149 reporting period, an insurer shall file a report with the
150 commissioner which shall include all of the following
151 information for the previous reporting period:
152 a. All dental care services and products offered by the
153 insurer, identified by market with the number of individuals
154 enrolled within each market segment.
155 b. Dental loss ratio.
156 c. The aggregated claims paid by the insurer for dental
157 care services, including each amount required under
158 subparagraphs (b)(3)a.1. through 3.
159 d. The amount of premiums collected by the insurer,
160 including each amount required under subparagraphs (b)(3)b.1.
161 and 2.
162 e. Overhead expenses in total, to include in that total
163 each amount required under paragraphs (b)(4)a. through m.
164 (2) The commissioner shall make available to the public
165 the information submitted by the insurer pursuant to
166 subdivision (1) by posting the information on the website of
167 the Department of Insurance of the State of Alabama.
168 (3)a. If the commissioner has reasonable cause to
Page 6

(3)a. If the commissioner has reasonable cause to
SB81 INTRODUCED
169 believe that the information submitted by the insurer pursuant
170 to subdivision (1) is erroneous or false, the commissioner may
171 conduct an examination of the insurer to verify the
172 information submitted, according to the procedures provided
173 under Article 1 of Chapter 2 of Title 27, Code of Alabama
174 1975.
175 b. The provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 2 of Title
176 27, Code of Alabama 1975, including confidentiality of
177 information, remedies, and procedures available to both the
178 commissioner and the insurer, shall govern an examination
179 conducted pursuant to paragraph a.
180 (d)(1) If the report required by subsection (c), as
181 submitted by the insurer or as adjusted by the commissioner
182 upon an examination as provided in that subsection shows that
183 the dental loss ratio for the reporting period is less than
184 the percentage that applies under subdivision (b)(1) for
185 individual or group dental plans, the insurer shall refund the
186 excess premium collected to the covered individuals or groups
187 as a rebate.
188 (2) The total amount of the rebate shall equal the
189 amount by which the dental loss ratio authorized by
190 subdivision (b)(1) exceeds the insurer's reported dental loss
191 ratio, multiplied by the amount of all premiums collected by
192 the insurer as calculated under paragraph (b)(3)b.
193 (3) Within 60 days of the calculation of the rebate,
194 the insurer shall notify all individuals and groups that were
195 covered under the applicable reporting period that they
196 qualify for the refund, which may be paid directly to the
Page 7

qualify for the refund, which may be paid directly to the
SB81 INTRODUCED
197 individuals and groups or issued as a credit on the premium
198 for the subsequent reporting period.
199 (e) The commissioner shall adopt rules, forms, and
200 schedules necessary to implement and enforce this section.
201 Section 2. Sections 10A-20-6.16 and 27-21A-23, Code of
202 Alabama 1975, are amended to make conforming changes to read
203 as follows:
204 "§10A-20-6.16
205 (a) No statute of this state applying to insurance
206 companies shall be applicable to any corporation organized
207 under this article and amendments thereto or to any contract
208 made by the corporation; except the corporation shall be
209 subject to the following:
210 (1) The provisions regarding annual premium tax to be
211 paid by insurers on insurance premiums.
212 (2) Chapter 55 of Title 27.
213 (3) Article 2 and Article 3 of Chapter 19 of Title 27.
214 (4) Section 27-1-17.
215 (5) Chapter 56 of Title 27.
216 (6) Rules adopted by the Commissioner of Insurance
217 pursuant to Sections 27-7-43 and 27-7-44.
218 (7) Chapter 54 of Title 27.
219 (8) Chapter 57 of Title 27.
220 (9) Chapter 58 of Title 27.
221 (10) Chapter 59 of Title 27.
222 (11) Chapter 54A of Title 27.
223 (12) Chapter 12A of Title 27.
224 (13) Chapter 2B of Title 27.
Page 8

(13) Chapter 2B of Title 27.
SB81 INTRODUCED
225 (14) Chapter 29 of Title 27.
226 (15) Chapter 62 of Title 27.
227 (16) Chapter 63 of Title 27.
228 (17) Chapter 45A of Title 27.
229 (18) Section 1 of the act amending this section.
230 (b) The provisions in subsection (a) that require
231 specific types of coverage to be offered or provided shall not
232 apply when the corporation is administering a self-funded
233 benefit plan or similar plan, fund, or program that it does
234 not insure."
235 "§27-21A-23
236 (a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter,
237 provisions of the insurance law and provisions of health care
238 service plan laws shall not be applicable to any health
239 maintenance organization granted a certificate of authority
240 under this chapter. This provision shall not apply to an
241 insurer or health care service plan licensed and regulated
242 pursuant to the insurance law or the health care service plan
243 laws of this state except with respect to its health
244 maintenance organization activities authorized and regulated
245 pursuant to this chapter.
246 (b) Solicitation of enrollees by a health maintenance
247 organization granted a certificate of authority shall not be
248 construed to violate any provision of law relating to
249 solicitation or advertising by health professionals.
250 (c) Any health maintenance organization authorized
251 under this chapter shall not be deemed to be practicing
252 medicine and shall be exempt from the provisions of Section
Page 9

medicine and shall be exempt from the provisions of Section
SB81 INTRODUCED
253 34-24-310, et seq., relating to the practice of medicine.
254 (d) No person participating in the arrangements of a
255 health maintenance organization other than the actual provider
256 of health care services or supplies directly to enrollees and
257 their families shall be liable for negligence, misfeasance,
258 nonfeasance, or malpractice in connection with the furnishing
259 of such services and supplies.
260 (e) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed in any
261 way to repeal or conflict with any provision of the
262 certificate of need law.
263 (f) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), a
264 health maintenance organization shall be subject to all of the
265 following:
266 (1) Section 27-1-17.
267 (2) Chapter 56.
268 (3) Chapter 54.
269 (4) Chapter 57.
270 (5) Chapter 58.
271 (6) Chapter 59.
272 (7) Rules adopted by the Commissioner of Insurance
273 pursuant to Sections 27-7-43 and 27-7-44.
274 (8) Chapter 12A.
275 (9) Chapter 54A.
276 (10) Chapter 2B.
277 (11) Chapter 29.
278 (12) Chapter 62.
279 (13) Chapter 63.
280 (14) Chapter 45A
Page 10

(14) Chapter 45A
SB81 INTRODUCED
281 (15) Section 1 of the act amending this section."
282 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
283 1, 2026.
Page 11